Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 8.5 COMPETENCY TO PROCEED
16-8.5-111. Procedure after determination of competency or incompetency.

If the final determination made pursuant to section 16-8.5-103 is that the defendant is competent to proceed, the judge shall order that the suspended proceeding continue or, if a mistrial has been declared, shall reset the case for trial at the earliest possible date.

If the final determination made pursuant to section 16-8.5-103 is that the defendant is incompetent to proceed, the court has the following options:

If the defendant is charged with an offense as outlined in section 16-8.5-116 (7) and the competency evaluation has determined that the defendant meets the standard for civil certification pursuant to article 65 of title 27, the court may forgo any order of restoration and immediately order that proceedings be initiated by the county attorney or district attorney required to conduct proceedings pursuant to section 27-65-113 (6) for the civil certification of the defendant and dismiss the charges without prejudice in the interest of justice once civil certification proceedings have been initiated.

If the evaluator has provided an opinion that the defendant is incompetent to proceed and there is not a substantial probability that the defendant, with restoration services, will attain competency within the reasonably foreseeable future pursuant to section 16-8.5-105 (5)(e)(I)(B), (5)(e)(I)(C), or (5)(e)(I)(D), in lieu of ordering restoration treatment the court shall set a hearing within thirty-five days of receiving the report on the issue of whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future and, in the case of a finding pursuant to section 16-8.5-105 (5)(e)(I)(D), maintain competency through the adjudication of the case. At the hearing, there is a presumption that the defendant will not attain competency within the reasonably foreseeable future. A party attempting to overcome that presumption must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that there is a substantial probability that restoration efforts will be successful within the reasonably foreseeable future. At the conclusion of the hearing when there is an opinion pursuant to section 16-8.5-105 (5)(e)(I)(D), if the court finds that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future and maintain competency throughout the case, the court shall dismiss the case and may consider ordering the initiation of proceedings pursuant to section 16-8.5-116 (6)(b) or (6)(c). If the court determines that there is insufficient evidence to make an immediate finding of no substantial probability of restoration to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future, then the court shall order restoration education for an initial period of time not to exceed ninety-one days as provided for in this section and review of the case pursuant to section 16-8.5-116 (3) and (4). At the initial and subsequent review hearings, if the evaluator continues to opine that the defendant is incompetent to proceed and still unlikely to be restored, the court shall presume that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future and maintain competency through the adjudication of the case, and the court shall dismiss the case unless there is clear and convincing evidence that the person has made progress toward attaining competency and can maintain competency through the adjudication of the case. If the case is ordered dismissed, the department will have the same obligations pursuant to section 16-8.5-105 (5)(e)(I).

If the defendant is on bond or summons, the court shall order that restoration to competency take place on an outpatient basis, unless the department recommends inpatient restoration services pursuant to section 16-8.5-105 (5)(e)(II).

If the defendant is in custody and the recommendation is for outpatient restoration services, the court shall consider the release of the defendant on bond consistent with article 4 of this title 16 and the Colorado rules of criminal procedure.

As a condition of bond, the court shall order that the restoration take place on an outpatient basis. Pursuant to section 27-60-105, the behavioral health administration in the department is the entity responsible for the oversight of restoration education and coordination of all competency restoration services. As a condition of release for outpatient restoration services, the court may require pretrial services, if available, to work with the behavioral health administration and the restoration services provider under contract with the behavioral health administration to assist in securing appropriate support and care management services, which may include housing resources. The individual agency responsible for providing outpatient restoration services for the defendant shall notify the court or other designated agency within twenty-one days if restoration services have not commenced.

When the defendant is in custody on a misdemeanor, petty offense, or traffic offense, the court, within seven days of the defendant being found incompetent to proceed, shall set a hearing on bond. At the bond hearing there is a presumption that the court shall order a personal recognizance bond and outpatient restoration services. If the court does not order a personal recognizance bond and the defendant is committed for inpatient restoration, the court shall make findings of fact that extraordinary circumstances exist to overcome the presumption of release by clear and convincing evidence. If the court denies a personal recognizance bond, the court shall notify the department of the specific facts and findings that it relied upon in the order for restoration treatment.

If the court finds that the defendant is not eligible for release from custody or not able to post the monetary condition of bond, the court may commit the defendant to the custody of the department, in which case the executive director has the same powers with respect to commitment as the executive director has following a commitment pursuant to section 16-8-105.5 (4). At such time as the department recommends to the court that the defendant is restored to competency, the defendant may be returned to custody of the county jail or to previous bond status.

If the court has ordered outpatient restoration services and the department determines that it is unable, within a reasonable time, to provide restoration services on an outpatient basis, the department shall notify the court within fourteen days after its determination, at which point the court shall review the case and determine what interim mental health services can be provided within the community by the department or other community provider. If a court liaison is appointed, the department shall report to the court liaison every twenty-eight days thereafter concerning the availability of restoration services on an outpatient basis.

If the court commits the defendant to the custody of the department, the executive director has the same powers with respect to a commitment provided for in section 16-8-105.5 (4).

If the court has ordered inpatient restoration services, the department shall provide restoration services at an appropriate inpatient restoration services program. On and after July 1, 2019, the department shall offer tier 1 defendants admission for restoration services within seven days after receipt of the court order and collateral materials. On and after July 1, 2021, the department shall offer admission to tier 2 defendants within twenty-eight days after receipt of the court order and collateral materials. For tier 2 defendants, the department shall advise the court and, if a court liaison is appointed, the court liaison every twenty-eight days after the initial twenty-eight day period regarding the availability of a bed and when admission will be offered.

If the defendant is not offered admission and transported to the inpatient restoration services program within the time frames provided or in accordance with other court orders, the court may:

Review the case for consideration of outpatient restoration services and appropriate and necessary case management services coordinated with the department; if a court liaison is appointed, the court liaison; and pretrial services, if available; or

Make any other order determined to be necessary in order to secure the necessary restoration services.

If a defendant is receiving inpatient restoration services and the executive director concludes that a less restrictive facility would be more clinically appropriate, the executive director, with proper notice to the court, and consistent with the provisions of part 3 of article 4.1 of title 24, has the authority to move the defendant to a less restrictive facility if, in the executive director's opinion, the defendant is not yet restored to competency but he or she could be properly restored to competency in a less restrictive facility. If the defendant is not released from custody, the court shall order the department to provide inpatient services at a location determined by the department.

If the defendant is receiving inpatient restoration services and the executive director concludes that community-based restoration services would be more clinically appropriate, the department shall:

The court shall rule on the request within fourteen days after receipt of the request from the department.

(A) Notify the court and request that the defendant be considered for release on a nonmonetary bond if the defendant is not currently released on bond; and

(B) Provide to the court information regarding the appropriate outpatient restoration services, developed in conjunction with the court liaison, when assigned, and the reasons why the defendant could be properly restored to competency on an outpatient basis.

For a defendant allowed to reside out of the state of Colorado, the department may offer assistance to an out-of-state provider providing restoration services to the defendant in the state where the defendant resides.

When the department submits a report to the court that it is the position of the department that the defendant is restored to competency, the defendant may be returned to the custody of the county jail. If the recommendation is that the defendant be returned to the custody of the county jail, the department shall notify the sheriff of the jurisdiction where the defendant is to be returned and the court liaison. Within seventy-two hours after receipt of the notice, the sheriff shall return the defendant to the jail. When a defendant is transferred to the physical custody of the sheriff, the department shall work with the sheriff and any behavioral health providers in the jail to ensure that the jail has the necessary information to prevent any decompensation by the defendant while the defendant is in jail, which must include medication information when clinically appropriate. The report to the court must also include a statement that the department is returning the defendant to the custody of the county jail.

If the defendant was released on bond prior to the inpatient hospitalization, the defendant must be released pursuant to the bond with the conditions imposed by the court. The department shall assist the defendant with any and all necessary transportation and provide the necessary case and medication information for the defendant to the community agency that will provide ongoing services and medication support. The department shall notify the court and the court liaison that the department is returning the defendant to the community on bond status. The department, the court liaison, and the court, including pretrial services, shall coordinate to ensure that the defendant is advised of his or her next court appearance and all of the required terms and conditions of the release on bond.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1845, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-012), ch. 404, p. 2108, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(2) amended and (3) added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2280, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2)(a) and (2)(b)(II) amended and (2)(a.5) added, (SB 20-181), ch. 144, p. 625, § 2, effective June 29; (2)(a) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 283, § 8, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(2)(b)(II)(B) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1492, § 14, effective July 1; (2)(b)(II)(C), (2)(d), (2)(f)(I), (2)(f)(II)(A), and (2)(h)(I)(B) amended and (2)(i) added, (HB 22-1386), ch. 317, p. 2256, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3227, § 24, effective August 10.

16-8.5-112. Venue for collateral hearings.

If a defendant committed to the custody of the department for evaluation or for restoration treatment meets the constitutional requirements for the administration of involuntary medication, the defendant's treating physician may petition the court for an order requiring that the defendant accept the treatment or, alternatively, that the medication be forcibly administered to the defendant. The department shall, prior to the hearing on the petition, deliver a copy of the petition to the court that committed the defendant to the custody of the department, the prosecuting attorney, and the defendant's legal representation in the criminal case, if such representation exists, and to the defendant directly if he or she does not have legal representation. A physician shall assess and document the defendant's mental status prior to the administration of medication.

A petition for involuntary treatment shall be heard in the court of the jurisdiction where the defendant is located. The department shall promptly deliver a copy of the order granting or denying the petition to the court that committed the defendant to the custody of the department, the prosecuting attorney, and the defendant's legal representation in the criminal case, if such representation exists, and to the defendant directly if he or she does not have legal representation.

If the committing court elects to transfer venue for medication hearings to the court of the jurisdiction in which the defendant is located, the committing county shall reimburse the county in which the proceeding is heard for the reasonable costs incurred in conducting the proceeding. Alternatively, the district attorney for the committing county, or in any county or any city and county having a population exceeding fifty thousand persons the county attorney for the committing county, may prosecute the proceeding as the proponent of the physician's petition.

If a defendant committed to the custody of the department for evaluation or for restoration treatment is ordered by a court to accept treatment as set forth in subsection (1) of this section and is subsequently returned to jail for pending court proceedings, the county jail may require the defendant to continue to receive the same court-ordered treatment that was administered by the department before the defendant was discharged from inpatient care, or, alternatively, appropriate medical personnel provided by the jail may forcibly administer such court-ordered medication to the defendant.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1846, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, (HB 09-1253), ch. 128, p. 550, § 2, effective August 5.

16-8.5-113. Restoration to competency.

The court may order a restoration hearing at any time on its own motion, on motion of the prosecuting attorney, or on motion of the defendant.

Within fourteen days after receipt of a report from the department or other court-approved provider of restoration services certifying that the defendant is competent to proceed, either party may request a hearing or a second evaluation. The court shall determine whether to allow the second evaluation or proceed to a hearing on competency. If the second evaluation is requested by the court or by an indigent defendant, it must be paid for by the court.

If a second evaluation is allowed, any pending requests for a hearing must be continued until receipt of the second evaluation report. The report of the expert conducting the second evaluation report must be completed and filed with the court within thirty-five days after the court order allowing the second evaluation, unless the time period is extended by the court after a finding of good cause.

If neither party requests a hearing or second evaluation within the time frame set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the court shall enter a final determination, based on the information then available to the court, whether the defendant is or is not competent to proceed.

If a party makes a timely request for a hearing, the hearing shall be held within thirty-five days after the request for a hearing or, if applicable, within thirty-five days after the filing of the second evaluation report, unless the time is extended by the court after a finding of good cause.

At the hearing, the burden of submitting evidence and the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence shall be upon the party asserting that the defendant is competent. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether the defendant is restored to competency.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1846, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 852, § 81, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2283, § 6, effective July 1.

16-8.5-114. Procedure after hearing concerning restoration to competency.

If a defendant is found to be restored to competency after the hearing held pursuant to section 16-8.5-113, the court shall resume the criminal proceedings or order the sentence carried out. The court shall credit any time the defendant spent in confinement while committed pursuant to section 16-8.5-111 against any term of imprisonment imposed after restoration to competency.

If, after the hearing held pursuant to section 16-8.5-113, the court determines that the defendant remains incompetent to proceed, the court may continue or modify any orders entered at the time of the original determination of incompetency and may commit or recommit the defendant or enter any new order necessary to facilitate the defendant's restoration to mental competency, consistent with the requirements of section 16-8.5-111.

Evidence of any determination as to the defendant's competency or incompetency is not admissible on the issues raised by a plea of not guilty, not guilty by reason of insanity, or, for offenses that occurred before July 1, 1995, the affirmative defense of impaired mental condition.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1847, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2284, § 7, effective July 1.

16-8.5-115. Commitment and observation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1847, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (HB 16-1410), ch. 151, p. 451, § 2, effective July 1.

16-8.5-116. Certification - reviews - termination of proceedings - rules.

Subject to the time periods and legal standards set forth in this section, whichever is shortest, a defendant committed to the custody of the department or otherwise confined as a result of a determination of incompetency to proceed must not remain confined for a period in excess of the maximum term of confinement that could be imposed for only the single most serious offense with which the defendant is charged, less thirty percent for a misdemeanor offense and less fifty percent for a felony offense. At the end of such time period, the court shall dismiss the charges, and certification proceedings or provision of services, if any, are governed by article 65 or 10.5 of title 27.

Within ninety-one days after the entry of the court's order of commitment or order to receive outpatient restoration, the court shall review the case of a defendant who has been determined to be incompetent to proceed with regard to the probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future and with regard to the justification for certification, confinement, or continued restoration treatment. The review may be held in conjunction with a restoration hearing held pursuant to section 16-8.5-113. However, if at the review hearing, there is a request by the defendant for a restoration hearing pursuant to section 16-8.5-113, the court shall set the restoration hearing within thirty-five days after the request pursuant to the provisions of section 16-8.5-113.

On and after July 1, 2020, at least ten days before each review, the individual or entity evaluating the defendant shall provide the court with a report describing:

An opinion regarding the defendant's competency;

Whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future;

Whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the time periods established by this section;

Whether the defendant meets the requirements for certification set forth in article 65 of title 27 or is eligible for services pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27;

Any and all efforts made for restoration through medication, therapy, education, or other services and the outcome of those efforts in relation to restoring the defendant to competency;

Repealed.

If the defendant has failed to cooperate with treatment, whether the incompetency and mental or intellectual and developmental disability contributes to the defendant's refusal or inability to cooperate with restoration or prevents the ability of the defendant to cooperate with restoration; and

A summary of the observations of the defendant by the treating staff at the facility or other location where inpatient services were delivered.

Additionally, on and after July 1, 2020, at least ten days before each review, the department treating team shall provide to the court an additional report that summarizes:

What restorative education has been provided and the frequency of that education;

What medication has been administered, including voluntary or involuntary medications;

What release plans have been made for the defendant after release, including a discussion of the support from family members;

Whether or not the defendant would agree to voluntary admission to the hospital for certification pursuant to article 65 of title 27;

The opinion of the treating team on the defendant's mental health functioning and ability to function on an outpatient basis for restoration services; and

Whether the defendant, based on observations of the defendant's behavior in the facility, presents a substantial risk to the physical safety of himself or herself, of another person, or of the community if released for community restoration.

After the initial review pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the court shall review the case of the defendant every ninety-one days thereafter until four reviews have been conducted. At least ten days before each review, the individual or entity evaluating the defendant shall provide the court with an updated report as described in subsection (2)(b) of this section and the treatment staff shall provide an updated summary of observations as described in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

After the fourth review, the court shall review the competency of the defendant every ninety-one days until the defendant is restored to competency or the court determines, based on available evidence, that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency in the reasonably foreseeable future. If the court determines based on available evidence there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency in the reasonably foreseeable future, the court shall dismiss the case subject to the provisions of subsection (10) of this section.

The court shall forward a copy of each report and summary received pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section to the county attorney or district attorney required to conduct proceedings pursuant to section 27-65-113 (6) for the county in which the case is pending and, when a court liaison is appointed, to the court liaison.

Notwithstanding the time periods provided in subsections (7), (8), and (9) of this section and to ensure compliance with relevant constitutional principles, for any offense for which the defendant is ordered to receive competency restoration services in an inpatient or outpatient setting, if the court determines, based on available evidence, that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will be restored to competency within the reasonably foreseeable future, the court may order the defendant's release from commitment pursuant to this article 8.5 through one or more of the following means:

Upon motion of the district attorney, the defendant, or on its own motion, the court may terminate the criminal proceedings, the commitment, or the restoration services order;

The court may, in coordination with the county attorney or district attorney required to conduct proceedings pursuant to section 27-65-113 (6) for the county in which the defendant is charged, order the commencement of certification proceedings pursuant to the provisions of article 65 of title 27 if the defendant meets the requirements for certification pursuant to article 65 of title 27;

In the case of a defendant who has been found eligible for services pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27 due to an intellectual and developmental disability, the court or a party may initiate an action to restrict the rights of the defendant pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27; or

On and after July 1, 2020, the department shall ensure that case management services and support are made available to any defendant released from commitment pursuant to this article 8.5 due to the substantial probability that the defendant will not be restored to competency in the reasonable foreseeable future.

At any review hearing held concerning the defendant's competency to proceed, the court shall dismiss the charges against the defendant and release the defendant from confinement, subject to the provisions of subsection (10) of this section, if:

The defendant:

Is charged with a misdemeanor, a misdemeanor drug offense, a petty offense, or a traffic offense;

Has been committed to the custody of the department or otherwise confined as a result of a determination of incompetency to proceed;

Has received competency restoration services while committed or otherwise confined for an aggregate time of six months; and

The court determines, based on available evidence, that the defendant remains incompetent to proceed.

At any review hearing held concerning the defendant's competency to proceed, the court shall dismiss the charges against the defendant and release the defendant from confinement, subject to the provisions of subsection (10) of this section, if:

The defendant:

Is charged with a class 5 or class 6 felony, except for those offenses enumerated in section 24-4.1-302 (1), or with a level 3 or level 4 drug felony;

Has been committed to the custody of the department or otherwise confined as a result of a determination of incompetency to proceed; and

Has received competency restoration services while committed or otherwise confined for an aggregate time of one year; and

The court determines, based on available evidence, that the defendant remains incompetent to proceed.

If the defendant is charged with any other felony offense except a class 1, 2, or 3 felony offense; a sex offense as defined in section 18-1.3-1003 (5); a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2); or a level 1 or level 2 drug felony, and has been committed to the custody of the department or otherwise confined as a result of a determination of incompetency to proceed, the following provisions apply:

If the defendant has received competency restoration services while committed or otherwise confined for an aggregate time of two years and the court determines, based on available evidence, that the defendant is not restored to competency, then the court shall dismiss the charges against the defendant, subject to the provisions of subsection (10) of this section, unless any party objects to dismissal.

If a party objects to dismissal of charges pursuant to subsection (9)(a) of this section, the court shall set the matter for a hearing. Upon completion of the hearing, the court shall dismiss the charges unless the court determines that the party objecting to the dismissal establishes by clear and convincing evidence that there is a compelling public interest in continuing the prosecution and there is a substantial probability that the defendant will attain competency in the foreseeable future. If the court declines to dismiss the charges, the court shall address the appropriateness of continued confinement and may alter or reduce bond if appropriate pursuant to article 4 of this title 16 or the decision to commit the defendant to the department pursuant to section 16-8.5-111.

Prior to the dismissal of charges pursuant to subsection (1), (4), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, the court shall identify whether the defendant meets the requirements for certification pursuant to article 65 of title 27, or for the provision of services pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27, or whether the defendant will agree to a voluntary commitment. If the court finds the requirements for certification or provision of services are met or the defendant does not agree to a voluntary commitment, the court may stay the dismissal for twenty-one days and notify the department and county attorney or district attorney required to conduct proceedings pursuant to section 27-65-113 (6) in the relevant jurisdiction of the pending dismissal so as to provide the department and the county attorney or district attorney with the opportunity to pursue certification proceedings or the provision of necessary services.

In any circumstance where the defendant's case was dismissed or the defendant was released from confinement, the court shall enter a written decision explaining why the court did or did not terminate the criminal proceeding or the commitment or restoration order.

If charges against a defendant are dismissed pursuant to this section, such charges are not eligible for sealing pursuant to section 24-72-705.

The department shall promulgate such rules as necessary to consistently enforce the provisions of this article 8.5.

On and after July 1, 2020, the court may, at any time of the restoration process, order the department to provide the court with an appropriate release plan for the reintegration of the defendant into the community with appropriate services.

When the defendant is charged with an offense in municipal court and the defendant is found incompetent to proceed, or when civil commitment proceedings are initiated pursuant to article 65 of title 27, the municipal court shall dismiss the case.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1847, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 783, § 22, effective April 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section R&RE, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2284, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(7)(a)(I) amended and (15) added, (SB 20-181), ch. 144, p. 627, § 3, effective June 29; (12) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1046, § 26, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3163, § 173, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(2)(a), (4), (5), IP(6), (8)(a)(I), and (10) amended and (2)(b)(VI) repealed, (HB 22-1386), ch. 317, p. 2257, § 4, effective July 1; (5), (6)(b), and (10) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3228, § 25, effective August 10.

16-8.5-117. Escape - return to institution.

If a defendant committed to the custody of the executive director for a competency evaluation or for restoration to competency escapes from the institution or hospital, it is the duty of the chief officer of the institution or hospital to apply to the district court for the county in which the institution or hospital is located for a warrant of arrest directed to the sheriff of the county, commanding him or her to take all necessary legal action to effect the arrest of the defendant and to return the defendant promptly to the institution or hospital. The fact of an escape becomes a part of the official record of the defendant and shall be certified to the committing court as part of the record in any proceeding to determine whether the defendant is eligible for release on bond or from custody.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1848, § 2, effective July 1.

16-8.5-118. Temporary removal for treatment and rehabilitation.

The chief officer of an institution in which a defendant has been committed under this article may authorize treatment and rehabilitation activities involving temporary physical removal of the person from the institution in which the defendant has been placed, according to the procedures and requirements of section 16-8-118.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1848, § 2, effective July 1.

16-8.5-119. Competency evaluation advisory board - creation - membership - duties - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 1848, § 2, effective July 1.

16-8.5-120. Competency evaluation monitoring system - users - rules.

The department, with assistance from the judicial department, shall develop an electronic system to track the status of defendants in the criminal justice system for whom a competency evaluation or competency restoration has been ordered. The system must contain information on the following:

The date the court ordered the evaluation;

The dates of and locations where the evaluation was started and completed;

The date of and location where the defendant entered restoration services;

The dates and results of court reviews of competency;

Inpatient bed space;

Community restoration capacity; and

Financial estimates of costs of each inpatient and outpatient program to identify inefficiencies.

The department shall establish who has access to enter information into the electronic system and who may have read-only access to the electronic system.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2289, § 9, effective July 1.

16-8.5-121. Restoration services placement guideline - committee - creation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2289, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2019, p. 2289.)

16-8.5-122. Forensic evaluator training.

By February 1, 2020, the department shall create a partnership with an accredited institution of higher education in the state to develop and provide rigorous training in forensic evaluation. On or before January 1, 2021, newly hired competency evaluators must complete a training that addresses competency, sanity, report writing, expert testimony, and other skills crucial for forensic evaluators; except that competency evaluators who are forensic psychiatrists certified or certification-eligible by the American board of psychiatry and neurology and forensic psychologists who are certified or certification-eligible by the American board of forensic psychology may be exempt from any training requirements as outlined in this section through an exemption process to be developed by the department. The state will manage an oversight program that will provide support and ensure quality of forensic evaluators.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2290, § 11, effective July 1.

16-8.5-123. Competency services - inpatient beds - funding - repeal.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the department twenty-eight million five hundred sixty-two thousand eight hundred twenty-eight dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 (2)(a) to contract for additional inpatient beds for competency services provided pursuant to section 16-8.5-111 or for additional inpatient beds for individuals receiving mental health care and treatment pursuant to article 65 of title 27. If any unexpended or unencumbered money appropriated for a fiscal year remains at the end of that fiscal year, the department may expend the money for the same purposes in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the department eight hundred thousand dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 (2)(a) to contract for a feasibility study of renovating and staffing a facility in Adams county to provide inpatient beds for competency services provided pursuant to section 16-8.5-111 and individuals receiving mental health care and treatment pursuant to article 65 of title 27. The department must receive the results from the feasibility study on or before September 15, 2022.

This section is repealed, effective December 31, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1386), ch. 317, p. 2258, § 5, effective July 1.